Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 1. In General
§ 6-1-104.
Definitions.

As used in this act, unless otherwise defined:

“Bodily injury” means:

A cut, abrasion, burn or temporary disfigurement;

Physical pain; or

Impairment of the function of a bodily member, organ or mental faculty.

“Coin machine” means a mechanical or electronic device or receptacle designed to:

Receive a coin, bill or token made for that purpose; and

Automatically offer, provide or assist in providing or permit the acquisition of property or service in return for the insertion of the coin, bill or token.

“Criminal negligence” is defined as the following conduct: A person acts with criminal negligence when, through a gross deviation from the standard of care that a reasonable person would exercise, he fails to perceive a substantial and unjustifiable risk that the harm he is accused of causing will occur, and the harm results. The risk shall be of such nature and degree that the failure to perceive it constitutes a gross deviation from the standard of care that a reasonable person would observe in the situation;

“Deadly weapon” means but is not limited to a firearm, explosive or incendiary material, motorized vehicle, an animal or other device, instrument, material or substance, which in the manner it is used or is intended to be used is reasonably capable of producing death or serious bodily injury;

“Occupied structure” means a structure or vehicle whether or not a person is actually present:

Where any person lives or carries on business or other calling;

Where people assemble for purposes of business, government, education, religion, entertainment or public transportation;

Which is used for overnight accommodation of persons; or

In which a person may reasonably be expected to be present.

“Peace officer” includes the following officers assigned to duty in the state of Wyoming:

Any duly authorized sheriff, under sheriff or deputy sheriff;

Any duly authorized member of a municipal police force, a college or university campus police force or the Wyoming highway patrol;

Game and fish law enforcement personnel qualified pursuant to W.S.

9-1-701

through

9-1-707

and:

When enforcing felony statutes following observation or discovery of the commission of a felony which was observed or discovered during the performance of their official duties;

While responding to requests to assist other peace officers performing their official duties or when enforcing a valid arrest warrant for any crime; or

When performing their official duties or enforcing any provision of title 23 and chapter 13 of title 41, any rule and regulation promulgated by the Wyoming game and fish commission or any other statute for which they are granted statutory enforcement authority.

Agents of the division of criminal investigation appointed pursuant to W.S.

9-1-613

who have qualified pursuant to W.S.

9-1-701

through

9-1-707

;

Any duly authorized arson investigator employed by the state fire marshal;

Investigators and brand inspectors of the Wyoming livestock board who have qualified pursuant to W.S. 9-1-701 through 9-1-707 when:

Enforcing W.S.

6-3-201

,

6-3-401

,

6-3-402

,

6-3-410

,

6-3-601

through

6-3-603

,

6-3-607

,

6-3-610

through

6-3-612

,

6-3-1002

,

6-3-1003

,

6-3-1005

,

6-9-202

,

35-10-101

,

35-10-102

and

35-10-104

, the provisions of title 11 and any laws prohibiting theft or mutilation of livestock or any part thereof and any rule or regulation promulgated by the Wyoming livestock board or any other law for which they are granted statutory enforcement authority;

Responding to a request to assist another peace officer as defined in this paragraph performing his official duty; or

Enforcing a valid arrest warrant for a crime specified in subdivision (F)(I) of this paragraph.

Federal law enforcement agents;

Investigators employed by the Wyoming state board of outfitters and professional guides and qualified pursuant to W.S. 9-1-701 through 9-1-707, when enforcing W.S.

23-2-401

and

23-2-406

through

23-2-418

and board rules and regulations promulgated under W.S. 23-2-410(a)(ii);

Any duly authorized detention officer who has qualified pursuant to W.S. 9-1-701 through 9-1-707, when engaged in the performance of his duties;

Any person employed by the state department of corrections on a full-time basis as a correctional officer to care for, supervise and control persons under the custody of the department, when the person is engaged in the performance of his duties;

Any peace officer certified by another state who has been appointed as a special deputy sheriff of a Wyoming county pursuant to W.S. 18-3-602(c);

Certified law enforcement officers of an adjoining state while responding to a request for assistance from a peace officer in this state pursuant to the “Law Enforcement Interstate Mutual Aid Act” or other lawful request;

The director and full-time staff instructors of the Wyoming law enforcement academy when duly appointed and acting pursuant to W.S. 9-1-633(b);

Any superintendent, assistant superintendent or full-time park ranger of any state park, state recreation area, state archeological site or state historic site who has qualified pursuant to W.S. 9-1-701 through 9-1-707, when acting within the boundaries of the state park, state recreation area, state archeological site or state historic site or when responding to a request to assist other peace officers acting within the scope of their official duties in their own jurisdiction;

Any duly authorized court security officer employed by the Wyoming supreme court who is qualified pursuant to W.S. 9-1-701 through 9-1-707 when:

Enforcing Wyoming statutes or supreme court rules on premises where the supreme court is conducting business;

In fresh pursuit of a person whom the officer has probable cause to believe has committed within the officer’s jurisdiction a violation of a state statute, or for whom an arrest warrant is outstanding for any criminal offense; or

When responding to a request to assist other peace officers acting within the scope of their official duties in their own jurisdiction.

Any person qualified pursuant to W.S. 9-1-701 through 9-1-707 and employed by the Wyoming gaming commission when engaged in the performance of that person’s duties or when responding to a request to assist other peace officers acting within the scope of their official duties in their own jurisdiction.

“Person” includes an individual, partnership, corporation, joint stock company or any other association or entity, public or private;

“Property” means anything of value whether tangible or intangible, real or personal, public or private;

“Recklessly” is defined as the following conduct: A person acts recklessly when he consciously disregards a substantial and unjustifiable risk that the harm he is accused of causing will occur, and the harm results. The risk shall be of such nature and degree that disregarding it constitutes a gross deviation from the standard of conduct that a reasonable person would observe in the situation;

“Serious bodily injury” means bodily injury which:

Creates a substantial risk of death;

Causes severe protracted physical pain;

Causes severe disfigurement or protracted loss or impairment of a bodily function;

Causes unconsciousness or a concussion resulting in protracted loss or impairment of the function of a bodily member, organ or mental faculty;

Causes burns of the second or third degree over a significant portion of the body; or

Causes a significant fracture or break of a bone.

“Vehicle” means any device by which persons or property may be moved, carried or transported over land, water or air;

“Violent felony” means murder, manslaughter, kidnapping, sexual assault in the first or second degree, robbery, aggravated assault, strangulation of a household member, aircraft hijacking, arson in the first or second degree, aggravated burglary, a violation of W.S. 6-2-314(a)(i) or 6-2-315(a)(ii) or a third, or subsequent, domestic battery under W.S.

6-2-511

(a) and (b)(iii);

“Torture”, “torment” or “cruelty” means every act, omission or neglect whereby the willful and malicious infliction of pain or suffering is caused, permitted or allowed to continue when there is a reasonable remedy or relief;

“Criminal street gang” means an ongoing formal or informal organization, association or group of five (5) or more persons having as one (1) of its primary activities the commission of one (1) or more of the criminal acts enumerated in paragraph (xv) of this subsection, having a common name or identifying sign or symbol and whose members or associates individually or collectively engage in or have been engaged in a pattern of criminal street gang activity;

“Pattern of criminal street gang activity” means the commission of, conviction or adjudication for or solicitation, conspiracy or attempt to commit two (2) or more of the offenses listed in this paragraph on separate occasions within a three (3) year period. Offenses that form a pattern of criminal street gang activity include:

A violent felony as defined in paragraph (xii) of this subsection;

Promoting prostitution in violation of W.S.

6-4-103

;

Felony property destruction and defacement in violation of W.S.

6-3-201

and punishable under W.S. 6-3-201(b)(iii);

Theft in violation of W.S.

6-3-402

;

Repealed by Laws 2020, ch. 90, § 3.

Forgery in violation of W.S.

6-3-602

;

Influencing, intimidating or impeding jurors, witnesses and officers, or obstructing or impeding justice in violation of W.S.

6-5-305

;

Possession of a firearm by a person convicted of certain felony offenses in violation of W.S.

6-8-102

;

Wearing or carrying concealed weapons in violation of W.S.

6-8-104

;

Possession, manufacture or disposition of a deadly weapon with unlawful intent in violation of W.S.

6-8-103

;

Blackmail in violation of W.S.

6-2-402

;

Possession, manufacture, transportation and sale of any explosive, improvised explosive device or incendiary apparatus with unlawful intent in violation of W.S.

6-3-111

;

Sports bribery in violation of W.S.

6-3-609

;

Cruelty to animals in violation of W.S.

6-3-1002

(a)(v) through (ix);

The unlawful sale or possession with intent to manufacture, distribute or dispense a controlled substance in violation of W.S.

35-7-1031

;

Simple assault in violation of W.S. 6-2-501(a) and domestic assault in violation of W.S.

6-2-510

;

Battery in violation of W.S. 6-2-501(b) and domestic battery in violation of W.S.

6-2-511

.

“Courtroom” means a room in which a judge is presiding over a court of law;

“Female genital mutilation” includes the partial or total removal of the clitoris, prepuce, labia minora, with or without excision of the labia majora, the narrowing of the vaginal opening such as through the creation of a covering seal formed by cutting and repositioning the inner or outer labia, with or without removal of the clitoris, any harmful procedure to the genitalia, including pricking, piercing, incising, scraping or cauterizing or any other actions intended to alter the structure or function of the female genitalia for nonmedical reasons. “Female genital mutilation” does not include a procedure performed by a licensed health care provider that is medically necessary due to a medically recognized condition or medically advisable or necessary to preserve or protect the physical health of the person on whom it is performed;

“Unborn child” means a member of the species homo sapiens, at any state of development, who is carried in a womb;

“This act” means title 6 of the Wyoming statutes.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 1985, ch. 43, § 1; ch. 215, § 2; 1994, ch. 47, § 1; 1996, ch. 68, § 1; 1999, ch. 96, § 1; 2000, ch. 61, § 1; ch. 86, § 1; 2001, ch. 45, § 1; ch. 49, § 1; ch. 133, § 1; ch. 177, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 53, § 2; ch. 118, § 1; 2004, ch. 6, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2007, ch. 159, § 2; 2009, ch. 10, § 1; ch. 64, § 1; 2010, ch. 42, § 2; ch. 69, § 207; ch. 73, § 1; 2013 ch. 160, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2014 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2014 ch. 13, § 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2018 ch. 88, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2020 ch. 90, §§ 1, 3, effective July 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 105, § 2, effective July 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 114, § 2, effective March 17, 2020; 2020 ch. 121, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 30, § 2, effective July 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 116, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to the Wyoming livestock board, see §

11-18-101

.

As to sanction levels when a child is adjudicated as delinquent, see §

14-6-246

.

As to the state highway patrol, see §

24-12-101

.

As to state fire marshal, see §

35-9-104

.

The 2004 amendment

added (a)(vi)(P).

Laws 2004, ch. 6, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 1, 2004.

The 2006 amendment

made a stylistic change in (a)(vi).

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, inserted “sexual abuse of a minor” in (a).

The 2009 amendments. —

The first 2009 amendment, by ch. 10, § 1,
in (a)(vi)(P), inserted “state recreation area, state archeological site” twice, and inserted “state” preceding “historic site” twice.

Laws 2009, ch. 10, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 24, 2009.

The second 2009 amendment, by ch. 64, § 1, effective July 1, 2009, deleted “while supervising a detainee who has been convicted as a felon” from the end of (a)(vi)(J), and made a related change.

The 2010 amendments. —

The first
2010 amendment, by ch. 42, § 2, effective July 1, 2010, added (a)(xiv) and (a)(xv).

The second
2010 amendment, by ch. 69, § 207, effective July 1, 2010, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “this act” for “W.S.

6-1-101

through

6-10-203

”; and added (a)(xvi).

The third 2010 amendment, by ch. 73, § 1, effective July 1, 2010, added (a)(vi)(Q), and made related changes.

No amendment gave effect to the others and this section is set out as reconciled by the legislative service office.

The 2013 amendments. —

The first 2013 amendment, by ch. 160, §
1, effective July 1, 2013, added (xvi), redesignating existing (a)(xvi) as (a)(xvii).

The second
2013 amendment, by ch. 191 §
2, effective July 1, 2013, substituted “Theft” for “Larceny” in (a)(xv)(D).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in the section as set out above.

The 2014 amendments. —

The first 2014 amendment, by ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2014, effective July 1, 2014, in the introductory paragraph of (a)(i), deleted “physical pain, illness or any impairment of physical condition”; added (a)(i)(A) through (a)(i)(C); in the introductory paragraph of (x), deleted “creates a substantial risk of death or which causes miscarriage, severe disfigurement or protracted loss or impairment o the function of any bodily member or organ”; and added (a)(x)(A) through (a)(x)(F).

The second
2014 amendment, by ch. 13, § 2, effective July 1, 2014, in (a)(xv)(R), added “and domestic assault in violation of
W.S.

6-2-510

”; in (a)(xv)(S), added “and domestic battery in violation of
W.S.

6-2-511

.”

While neither
amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in
this section as set out above.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a)(xii), inserted “strangulation of a household member,” added “or a third, or subsequent, domestic battery under W.S. 6-2-511(a) and (b)(iii)” at the end, and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, by ch. 90, §§ 1, 3, effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(vi)(F)(I) substituted “6-3-401,

6-3-402

,

6-3-410

” for “6-3-401 through

6-3-403

,

6-3-407

,

6-3-410

”; and repealed (a)(xv)(E), which read “Wrongful taking or disposing of property in violation of W.S.

6-3-403

.”

The second 2020 amendment, by ch. 105, § 2, effective July 1, 2020, added (a)(xvii); and redesignated former (a)(xvii) as (a)(xviii).

The third 2020 amendment, by ch. 114, § 2, added (a)(vi)(R) and made a related change.

Laws 2020, ch. 114, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 17, 2020.

The fourth 2020 amendment, by ch. 121, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(vi)(C)(I) substituted “official duties” for “statutory duties”; and in (a)(vi)(C)(III) substituted “When performing their official duties or enforcing” for “When enforcing.”

While none of the amendments gave effect to the others, all have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 30, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, in (a)(vi)(F)(I), deleted "6-3-203" following "6-3-201" and added "6-3-1002,

6-3-1003

,

6-3-1005

"; in (a)(xv)(P), deleted "Aggravated" at the beginning, substituted "6-3-1002(a)(v) through (ix)" for "6-3-203(c)" and made related changes.

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 116, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, added (a)(xviii) and redesignated former (a)(xviii) as (a)(xix).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subparagraph (a)(vi)(I), (a)(vi)(L), (a)(xv)(I), or (a)(xv)(L) or subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2022, Ch. 48, §§ 1 and 2, state as follows:

“Section 1.

“(a) The legislature finds that:

“(i) As a result of the 2021 General Session of the Wyoming Legislature, 2021 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 109 (original 2021 Senate File 56) (‘2021 Act’) became law. The 2021 Act intended to repeal Section 1 of 2020 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 114 (original 2020 House Bill 171) (‘2020 Act’) and to codify and otherwise address all issues contained in Section 1 of the 2020 Act;

“(ii) The 2021 Act was not intended to repeal the 2020 Act in its entirety. However, due to a scrivener's error, the 2021 Act omitted a reference to ‘Section 1’ in Section 6, the ‘repealer section’ and instead stated, ‘2020 Wyoming Sessions Laws, Chapter 114 is repealed[;]’;

“(iii) Repeal of the entire 2020 Act was not intended by the legislature in the 2021 Act;

“(iv) The legislature finds it necessary to clarify its intent and to enact into law appropriate legislation, as contained in this act.

“Section 2. 2021 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 109, Section 6 is amended to read:

“Section 6. 2020 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 114, Section 1 is repealed.”

Applicability. —

Laws 1996, ch. 68, § 2, effective July 1, 1996, provides that the act applies to capitol police designated and appointed after July 1, 1996. The section further provides that the capitol police employed prior to July 1, 1996 may elect to contribute and receive service retirement benefits under the Wyoming state highway patrol, game and fish warden and criminal investigator retirement program in lieu of contribution under the Wyoming retirement system, provides for the transfer of contributions pursuant to this election, makes these electors subject to certain benefit provisions, provides for the determination by the actuary for the Wyoming retirement system of the financial and actuarial impact of participation in the Wyoming state highway patrol, game and fish warden and criminal investigator retirement program, and provides for payment for the actuary determination by the attorney general.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 3, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

“Recklessly.” —

Evidence was insufficient to convict defendant of aggravated homicide by vehicle as the evidence did not show that she acted recklessly because she never admitted she was fatigued, let alone that she consciously disregarded any fatigue; she told a trooper that she did not think she fell asleep; there was direct evidence that she was not impaired; evidence that she failed to steer and brake both before and after striking the sedan, coupled with her lack of knowledge of what happened might support a reasonable inference she fell asleep, but it did not support the jury’s conclusion that she acted recklessly; and neither trooper testified that defendant ever suggested she was fatigued or not well-rested. Hightower v. State, 2020 WY 152, 477 P.3d 103,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 2020).

Intangible property.—

Available credit on credit cards was property subject to theft because the value of available credit on the credit cards was intangible property. Fox v. State, 2020 WY 88, 467 P.3d 140,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 2020).

Evidence sufficient.—

Evidence established that defendant’s wife experienced an impediment to the normal circulation of her blood causing bodily injury, and defendant’s strangulation conviction was affirmed; doctors testified that the wife had symptoms consistent with strangulation, including the petechiae and subconjunctival hemorrhages in both eyes, and while either symptom alone might not establish strangulation, the wife said defendant had choked her, and when she returned for more treatment two days later, she had severe bruising and pain in her neck. Gonzalez-Chavarria v. State, 2019 WY 100, 449 P.3d 1094,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 2019).

Deadly weapon.—

The State of Wyoming presented sufficient evidence to support defendant’s convictions for aggravated assault and battery by threatening to use a drawn deadly weapon because the victim testified that defendant threatened to use drawn deadly weapons (a beer bottle and a clay art piece) on the victim. Thompson v. State, 2018 WY 3, 408 P.3d 756,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 2018).

Evidence of serious bodily injury.—

The State of Wyoming presented sufficient evidence to support defendant’s convictions for aggravated assault and battery for causing serious bodily injury because defendant’s assault upon the victim resulted in the victim’s protracted hearing loss. Thompson v. State, 2018 WY 3, 408 P.3d 756,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 2018).

“Recklessly.” —

In order to demonstrate malicious intent for second-degree murder, the State must show a heightened form of recklessness as compared to that required for manslaughter because the State must show that the defendant acted recklessly under circumstances manifesting an extreme indifference to the value of human life; however, the trial court was not required to define “recklessly” to the jury as the formulation of the heightened standard of recklessness adequately distinguished second-degree murder from manslaughter; thus, the district court’s omission of a definition of “recklessly” or “recklessly under circumstances manifesting an extreme indifference to the value of human life” was not plainly erroneous. Schmuck v. State, 2017 WY 140, 406 P.3d 286,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 2017).

Violent felony.—

In sentencing
for being felon in possession of a firearm, a Wyoming conviction for
threatening to use a drawn deadly weapon qualified as a crime of violence
under U.S. Sentencing Guidelines Manual § 4B1.1 because the Wyoming
statute requires that a weapon be “drawn,” meaning in
a position for use when the threat was made. United States v. Devries, 708 Fed. Appx. 956, 2017 U.S. App. LEXIS 18335 (10th Cir. 2017).

Vacant structure as “occupied.” —

A structure “in which a person may reasonably be expected to be present” is one that is intended to be occupied and would be perceived by any reasonable person to be an occupied structure, although unoccupied at the time. Barnes v. State, 858 P.2d 522,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1993).

“Recklessly.” —

An instruction did not clearly and concisely inform the jury that “recklessly” was an element of involuntary manslaughter, in that it did not advise the jury that in order to find the defendant guilty of involuntary manslaughter, they had to find that he acted with “conscious disregard.” To act with “conscious disregard” implies intentional acts despite knowledge of the risk, while acting with “wanton disregard” (the language used in the instruction) implies acts done without conscious regard or heedlessly. Therefore, the instruction only created confusion in the minds of the jurors as to what actions constituted the crime in question. Vigil v. State, 859 P.2d 659,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. 1993).

Recklessness, as defined for involuntary manslaughter, involves a gross deviation from reasonableness, not a lack of necessity to threaten deadly force; thus, the giving of instructions that threats with a drawn deadly weapon or pointing a firearm at another amounts to recklessness, unless reasonably necessary for self-defense, was reversible error. Olson v. State, 960 P.2d 1019,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. 1998).

Evidence was sufficient to support jury's conclusion that defendant was acting recklessly at time of fatal accident, where he chose to drive his vehicle after being awake for twenty-four hours, smoking marijuana, and drinking beer and rum. Rogers v. State, 971 P.2d 599,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1999).

Affirmative defense of self-defense was not available to defendant charged with vehicular homicide, since crime involved a reckless act, rather than an intentional act. Duran v. State, 990 P.2d 1005,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Wyo. 1999), overruled, Haire v. State, 2017 WY 48, 393 P.3d 1304,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 2017).

Considering defendants' repeated failure to accept the remedial parenting advice and services of medical and educational professionals, and the evidence indicating their understanding of their children's needs, there was sufficient evidence to show that defendants acted recklessly through their conscious disregard of a substantial and unjustifiable risk of harm to their children. Gifford v. State, 2017 WY 93, 399 P.3d 1240,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 2017).

Violent felony. —

The inclusion of involuntary manslaughter in the definition of violent crimes and the exclusion of aggravated vehicular homicide is not an arbitrary and capricious classification in violation of equal protection. Small v. State, 689 P.2d 420,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 342

(Wyo. 1984), cert. denied, 469 U.S. 1224, 105 S. Ct. 1215, 84 L. Ed. 2d 356, 1985 U.S. LEXIS 1062 (U.S. 1985); Bell v. State, 693 P.2d 769,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 425

(Wyo. 1985).

Indecent liberties is not a “violent felony” as that phrase is defined by Wyoming law. Cooley v. State, 885 P.2d 875,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 1994).

The initially imposed sentences following the defendant's conviction for child abuse were illegal as a matter of law given that the habitual criminal statute, §

6-10-201

, applies only to “violent felonies” and that the statutory definition of violent felonies does not include felony child abuse. Rodgriguez v. State, 917 P.2d 172,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 1996), reh'g denied,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. June 11, 1996).

In a sexual assault case, defendant was properly sentenced to two consecutive life sentences where defendant subjected the victim to both vaginal and anal sexual penetration, as the acts constituted separate, forcible sexual intrusions on the victim. Daniel v. State, 2003 WY 132, 78 P.3d 205,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 2003), cert. denied, 540 U.S. 1205, 124 S. Ct. 1476, 158 L. Ed. 2d 127, 2004 U.S. LEXIS 1455 (U.S. 2004).

Aggravated robbery is “violent felony” within the meaning of habitual-criminal statute (§

6-10-201

).

While the legislature, in subsection (a)(xii), has defined “violent felony” to include robbery, and while aggravated robbery is not listed separately, it does not logically follow that the legislature would conclude that robbery is a violent felony while aggravated robbery is not.
Oakley v. State, 715 P.2d 1374,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 512

(Wyo. 1986).

Aggravated battery. —

In an aggravated battery prosecution, the prosecutor's burden was not to show that the defendant knew that the bottle used in the battery would break, only that it could cause death or bodily injury by striking somebody in the back of the head. Arevalo v. State, 939 P.2d 228,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. 1997).

Persons with “violent felony” convictions may not possess firearms. —

Government failed to prove that defendant possessed a rifle in violation of state law because Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-1-104(a)(xii) only prohibits persons with prior “violent felony” convictions from possessing firearms, and defendant's criminal history revealed no convictions for any “violent felonies” under Wyoming law. Therefore, the district court erred when it counted the possession of a rifle as relevant conduct under U.S. Sentencing Guidelines Manual § 1B1.3 and then enhanced defendant's base offense level by four levels pursuant to U.S. Sentencing Guidelines Manual § 2K2.1(b)(1)(B) for possessing eight firearms. United States v. Campbell, 372 F.3d 1179,

2004 U.S. App. LEXIS 12069

(10th Cir. Wyo. 2004).

“Deadly weapon.” —

Where defendant was convicted of one count of aggravated assault and battery after he waved a flare gun around during an altercation at a bar, the evidence was sufficient to establish that the flare gun was capable of firing a missile using an explosive charge and was capable of causing death or serious bodily injury where the investigating officer testified that the flare gun was regularly used to scare elk and deer out of haystacks and where he explained that, to use the gun, one placed a bomb or ammunition into the barrel, placed a primer underneath the hammer, and then cocked the hammer and that, when fired, the gun shot the projectile approximately 50 to 60 yards before it explodes like a very large firecracker. Further, the officer stated that, if the projectile were to hit a person, it would absolutely cause severe injury and possibly death; this testimony aptly demonstrates that the flare gun was capable of firing a missile using an explosive charge and was capable of causing death or serious bodily injury.
Schaeffer v. State, 2012 WY 9, 268 P.3d 1045,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 2012).

Vehicle as deadly weapon. —

Defendant charged with aggravated assault and battery was not entitled to jury instruction on lesser-included offenses of simple assault and of battery, since a rational jury could conclude only that defendant was using his vehicle in a manner reasonably capable of producing death or serious bodily injury. Carey v. State, 984 P.2d 1098,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 1999).

“Deadly weapon” includes unloaded firearm. —

Definition of “deadly weapon” includes an unloaded firearm, and therefore assault with an unloaded gun was properly elevated to offense of aggravated assault. Dike v. State, 990 P.2d 1012,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 176

(Wyo. 1999), cert. denied, 529 U.S. 1078, 120 S. Ct. 1697, 146 L. Ed. 2d 502, 2000 U.S. LEXIS 2756 (U.S. 2000).

“Deadly weapon” instruction does not necessitate “serious bodily injury” instruction. —

In a prosecution for aggravated assault and battery, it was not error for the court to instruct the jury as to the definition of “deadly weapon,” without instructing the jury as to the definition of “serious bodily injury,” which term is part of the definition of “deadly weapon.” Wilson v. State, 14 P.3d 912,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 234

(Wyo. 2000).

Evidence of serious bodily injury. —

Where assault charges arose from a taped interview with the victim who died before trial, because the victim's statement regarding her spinal injury and MRI results was not admissible under Wyo. R. Evid. 804(b)(6), proof of serious bodily injury was wanting as to count that defendant beat the victim with a stick across her back, causing multiple lacerations and bruising, and there was insufficient evidence that victim suffered a serious bodily injury despite victim's allegations that defendant beat the victim with a pistol belt full of 41-caliber shells causing multiple lacerations and bruising. Sarr v. State, 2003 WY 42, 65 P.3d 711,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 2003), aff'd, 2004 WY 20, 85 P.3d 439,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 2004).

Where the officer testified that after defendant kneed him in the groin, the officer went to the ground for 10 minutes while waiting for pain to subside, the officer suffered bodily injury as defined in this section, and defendant's conviction for felony interference with a peace officer in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-5-204(b) was affirmed. Mascarenas v. State, 2003 WY 124, 76 P.3d 1258,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 2003).

Victim impact statements presented in defendant's assault case concerned the victim's injuries and, therefore, were properly allowed because, in order to obtain a conviction for aggravated assault and battery, one of the elements the State was required to prove beyond a reasonable doubt was that defendant inflicted ‘serious bodily injury,’ and most of the testimony was relevant and admissible to prove that element of the crime charged. Given the weight of the evidence against defendant, no plain error resulted from the admission of the victim impact statements. Thomas v. State, 2006 WY 34, 131 P.3d 348,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 2006).

The district court was permitted to infer that the victim had been exposed to a risk of serious bodily injury within the meaning of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-1-104(a)(x) where she was the victim of a restrained, forcible nonconsensual sexual act. Sami v. State, 2004 WY 23, 85 P.3d 1014,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 2004).

Evidence was sufficient to establish that the victim suffered serous bodily injury under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 6-2-501(a)(1) and 6-1-104(a)(x) (2013) where the jury instruction only served to define one of the terms included in the elements, and there was extensive evidence showing that defendant caused the victim's broken jaw and resulting medical complications. Brown v. State, 2014 WY 104, 332 P.3d 1168,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 2014).

Definition of term used in definition of element. —

The decision to give or refuse an instruction on the statutory definition of a term used in defining an element of an offense is within the latitude afforded to the district court to tailor the instructions to the circumstances of the case. Wilson v. State, 14 P.3d 912,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 234

(Wyo. 2000).

Evidence sufficient. —

Evidence sufficient to uphold conviction. DeWitt v. State, 917 P.2d 1144,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 1996).

Evidence that the victim had extensive petechiae around her neck and ears, complained of a headache to the emergency room nurse, and was diagnosed with asphyxiation, or oxygen deprivation by a doctor, was sufficient to establish that the victim experienced bodily injury as defined by this section, and as required to prove strangulation under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-509

. Davis v. State, 2017 WY 147, 406 P.3d 1233,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Wyo. 2017).

Applied

in

Britt v. State, 734 P.2d 980,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 416

(Wyo. 1987); Sandy v. State, 870 P.2d 352,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1994); Rich v. State, 899 P.2d 1345,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 1995); Hodges v. State, 904 P.2d 334,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1995); Sindelar v. State, 932 P.2d 730,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1997); Mueller v. State, 2001 WY 134, 36 P.3d 1151,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 2001); Orona-Rangal v. State, 2002 WY 134, 53 P.3d 1080,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 2002).

Quoted

in

Naugher v. State, 685 P.2d 37,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 344

(Wyo. 1984); State v. Sodergren, 686 P.2d 521,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 300

(Wyo. 1984); Hurst v. State, 698 P.2d 1130,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 468

(Wyo. 1985); Gates v. Richardson, 719 P.2d 193,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 549

(Wyo. 1986); Paugh v. State, 9 P.3d 973,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 2000); Heinemann v. State, 12 P.3d 692,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 214

(Wyo. 2000); Lucero v. State, 14 P.3d 920,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 233

(Wyo. 2000); O'Brien v. State, 2002 WY 63, 45 P.3d 225,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 2002); Van Haele v. State, 2004 WY 59, 90 P.3d 708,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(2004); Daniel v. State, 2008 WY 87, 189 P.3d 859,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 90

(July 29, 2008); Fuller v. State, 2010 WY 55, 230 P.3d 309,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Apr. 28, 2010); Haire v. State, 2017 WY 48, 393 P.3d 1304,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 2017).

Stated

in

Keats v. State, 2003 WY 19, 64 P.3d 104,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2003); Strickland v. State, 2004 WY 91, 94 P.3d 1034,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(2004).

Cited

in

Marker v. State, 748 P.2d 295,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1988); Relish v. State, 860 P.2d 455,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1993); Bird v. State, 901 P.2d 1123,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1995); Mueller v. State, 2001 WY 134, 36 P.3d 1151,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 2001); Williams v. State, 2002 WY 136, 54 P.3d 248,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 2002); Young v. State, 2005 WY 136, 121 P.3d 145,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(2005); Flores v. State, 2017 WY 120, 403 P.3d 993,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 2017).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The State Attorney General and the Changing Face of Criminal Law,” see 19 Wyo. L.J. 1 (1964).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Sufficiency of allegations or evidence of serious bodily injury to support charge of aggravated degree of rape, sodomy, or other sexual abuse, 25 ALR4th 1213.

Sufficiency of evidence as to nature of firearm in prosecution under state statute prohibiting persons under indictment for, or convicted of, crime from acquiring, having, carrying or using firearms, 37 ALR4th 1179.

Corporation's criminal liability for homicide, 45 ALR4th 1021.

Fact that gun was unloaded as affecting criminal responsibility, 68 ALR4th 507.

Stationary object or attached fixture as deadly or dangerous weapon for purposes of statute aggravating offenses such as assault, robbery, or homicide, 8 ALR5th 775.

Recovery under state law for negligent infliction of emotional distress under rule of 29 A.L.R.3d 1316, or refinements thereof, 96 ALR5th 107.

Cigarette lighter as deadly or dangerous weapon, 22 A.L.R.6th 533.

What constitutes “violent felony” for purpose of sentence enhancement under Armed Career Criminal Act (18 USCS § 924(e)(1)), 119 ALR Fed 319.